Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-736
Existing associations; compliance with sections.

Any existing cooperative or nonprofit corporation or association, organized under any other law of this state for the purpose of engaging in rural electrification, may, by a majority vote of the members present in person at a meeting called for that purpose, amend its articles of incorporation so as to comply with sections 70-701 to 70-738.

Laws 1937, c. 50, § 32, p. 213;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 70-832;

R.S.1943, § 70-736.